Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 50.
ELECTIONS CONDUCTED BY BALLOT OR VOTING MACHINE (CONST., ART. 3, § 3, REPEALED AND NEW SECTIONS ADDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiative petition and adopted at the general election on Nov. 6, 1962, by a vote of 134,782 for and 132,123 against.

Effective Dates.

Const. Amend. 50, § 5: Jan. 15, 1963.

§ 1. Repeal of Article III, Section 3.

Article III, Section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas is hereby repealed and the following section is substituted therefor.

§ 2. Elections by ballot or voting machines authorized.

All elections by the people shall be by ballot or by voting machines which insure the secrecy of individual votes.

§ 3. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 81, which was proposed by H.J.R. 1004 during the 2001 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2002 general election. The former section provided: “In elections by ballot every ballot shall be numbered in the order in which it is received, the number shall be recorded by the election officers on the list of voters opposite the name of the elector who presents the ballot, and the election officers shall be sworn or affirmed not to disclose how any elector voted unless required to do so as witnesses in a judicial proceeding or a proceeding to contest an election.”

§ 4. Voting machines.

Voting machines may be used to such extent and under such rules as may be prescribed by the General Assembly.